Indiana, session 2026, SB69.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2021,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) Each fund member shall contribute
during the period of the fund member's employment or for thirty-two
(32) years, whichever is shorter, an amount equal to six percent (6%)
eight and sixty-five hundredths percent (8.65%) of the salary of a
first class patrolman or firefighter. However, the employer may pay:
(1) with respect to an agreement entered into:
(A) before January 1, 2027; or
(B) after June 30, 2029;
all or a part of the contribution for the member; and
(2) with respect to an agreement entered into after December
31, 2026, but before July 1, 2029:
(A) up to six percent (6%) of the contribution for the
member before July 1, 2029; and
(B) all or a part of the contribution for the member after
June 30, 2029.
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


The amount of the contribution, other than contributions paid on behalf
of a member, shall be deducted each pay period from each fund
member's salary by the disbursing officer of the employer. The
employer shall send to the system board each year on March 31, June
30, September 30, and December 31, for the calendar quarters ending
on those dates, or an alternate date established by the rules of the
system board, a certified list of fund members and a warrant issued by
the employer for the total amount deducted for fund members'
contributions.
(b) After December 31, 2011, an employer shall submit:
(1) the list described in subsection (a) in a uniform format through
a secure connection over the Internet or through other electronic
means specified by the system board; and
(2) the contributions paid by or on behalf of a member under
subsection (a) by electronic funds transfer.
(c) Except as provided in section 7(n) or 7.2 of this chapter, if a fund
member ends the fund member's employment other than by death or
disability before the fund member completes twenty (20) years of
active service, the system board shall return to the fund member in a
lump sum the fund member's contributions plus interest at a rate
specified by rule by the system board. If the fund member returns to
service, the fund member is entitled to credit for the years of service for
which the fund member's contributions were refunded if the fund
member repays the amount refunded to the fund member plus interest
at a rate specified by rule by the system board in either a lump sum or
a series of payments determined by the system board.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-8-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) Benefits paid under this section are
subject to section 2.5 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to a fund member who retires before
July 1, 2019. Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(b) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to fifty percent (50%) of the monthly salary of
a first class patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended the
member's active service plus:
(1) for a member who retires before January 1, 1986, two percent
(2%) of that salary for each full year of active service; or
(2) for a member who retires after December 31, 1985, one
percent (1%) of that salary for each six (6) months of active
service;
over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12) years.
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


(c) This subsection applies to a fund member who retires after June
30, 2019. Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(b) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to fifty-two percent (52%) of the monthly salary
of a first class patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended
the member's active service plus one percent (1%) of that salary for
each six (6) months of active service over twenty (20) years, to a
maximum of twelve (12) years.
(d) This subsection applies to a fund member who retires before
July 1, 2019. Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(c) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to fifty percent (50%) of the monthly salary of
a first class patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended the
member's active service plus one percent (1%) of that salary for each
six (6) months of active service over twenty (20) years, to a maximum
of twelve (12) years, all actuarially reduced for each month (if any) of
benefit payments prior to fifty-two (52) years of age, by a factor
established by the fund's actuary from time to time.
(e) This subsection applies to a fund member who retires after June
30, 2019. Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(c) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to fifty-two percent (52%) of the monthly salary
of a first class patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended
the member's active service plus one percent (1%) of that salary for
each six (6) months of active service over twenty (20) years, to a
maximum of twelve (12) years, all actuarially reduced for each month
(if any) of benefit payments prior to fifty-two (52) years of age, by a
factor established by the fund's actuary from time to time.
(b) Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(b) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to the following:
(1) For a fund member who retires before July 1, 2019, fifty
percent (50%) of the monthly salary of a first class patrolman
or firefighter in the year the member ended the member's
active service plus:
(A) for a member who retires before January 1, 1986, two
percent (2%) of that salary for each full year of active
service; or
(B) for a member who retires after December 31, 1985, one
percent (1%) of that salary for each six (6) months of
active service;
over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12) years.
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


(2) For a fund member who retires after June 30, 2019, and
before January 1, 2027, fifty-two percent (52%) of the
monthly salary of a first class patrolman or firefighter in the
year the member ended the member's active service plus one
percent (1%) of that salary for each six (6) months of active
service over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12)
years.
(3) For a fund member who retires after December 31, 2026,
fifty-three percent (53%) of the monthly salary of a first class
patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended the
member's active service plus one and one-quarter percent
(1.25%) of that salary for each six (6) months of active service
over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12) years.
(c) Each fund member who qualifies for a retirement benefit
payment under section 10(c) of this chapter is entitled to receive a
monthly benefit equal to the following:
(1) For a fund member who retires before July 1, 2019, fifty
percent (50%) of the monthly salary of a first class patrolman
or firefighter in the year the member ended the member's
active service plus one percent (1%) of that salary for each six
(6) months of active service over twenty (20) years, to a
maximum of twelve (12) years, all actuarially reduced for
each month (if any) of benefit payments prior to fifty-two (52)
years of age, by a factor established by the fund's actuary
from time to time.
(2) For a fund member who retires after June 30, 2019, and
before January 1, 2027, fifty-two percent (52%) of the
monthly salary of a first class patrolman or firefighter in the
year the member ended the member's active service plus one
percent (1%) of that salary for each six (6) months of active
service over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12)
years, all actuarially reduced for each month (if any) of
benefit payments prior to fifty-two (52) years of age, by a
factor established by the fund's actuary from time to time.
(3) For a fund member who retires after December 31, 2026,
fifty-three percent (53%) of the monthly salary of a first class
patrolman or firefighter in the year the member ended the
member's active service plus one and one-quarter percent
(1.25%) of that salary for each six (6) months of active service
over twenty (20) years, to a maximum of twelve (12) years, all
actuarially reduced for each month (if any) of benefit
payments prior to fifty-two (52) years of age, by a factor
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


established by the fund's actuary from time to time.
SECTION 3. IC 36-8-8-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.28-2008,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Benefits paid under this section are subject
to section 2.5 of this chapter.
(b) The heirs or estate of a fund member is entitled to receive at
least twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000) upon the fund member's death, adjusted annually by the
percentage increase, if any, in the consumer price index as
calculated under section 15 of this chapter.
(c) The board shall annually publish the total benefit payable
under this section on the board's website.
SECTION 4. IC 36-8-8.5-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. As used in this
chapter, "DROP retirement date" means the future retirement date
selected by a member at the time the member makes a DROP election
or extension.
SECTION 5. IC 36-8-8.5-10.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.129-2024,
SECTION 11 AND P.L.136-2024, SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a)
Notwithstanding section 10 of this chapter, a member that entered the
DROP before July 1, 2024, and that has not exited the DROP may elect
to extend the member's DROP retirement date up to sixty (60) months
after the member's DROP entry date.
(b) A member that makes the election described in subsection (a)
shall notify the member's employer within thirty (30) days of the
election.
SECTION 6. IC 36-8-8.5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2024,
SECTION 12 AND P.L.136-2024, SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a)
Subject to subsection (b), a member who enters the DROP established
by this chapter shall exit the DROP at the earliest of:
(1) the member's DROP retirement date;
(2) either:
(A) thirty-six (36) months after the member's DROP entry
date, if the member:
(i) executes an election described in section 10 of this
chapter before July 1, 2024; and
(ii) does not execute an extension described in section 10.5
of this chapter; or
(B) sixty (60) months after the member's DROP entry date, if
the member:
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


(i) executes an election described in section 10 of this
chapter after June 30, 2024; or
(ii) executes an extension described in section 10.5 of this
chapter;
(3) (2) the mandatory retirement age applicable to the member, if
any; or
(4) (3) the date the member retires because of a disability as
provided under section 16.5(d) of this chapter.
(b) A member of the 1925 fund, the 1937 fund, or the 1953 fund
who enters the DROP established by this chapter must exit the DROP
on the date the authority of the board of trustees of the Indiana public
retirement system to distribute from the pension relief fund established
under IC 5-10.3-11-1 to units of local government (described in
IC 5-10.3-11-3) amounts determined under IC 5-10.3-11-4.7 expires.
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Pensions and Labor, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 69, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Replace the effective date in SECTION 2 with "[EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]".
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 16, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 36-8-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2021,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) Each fund member shall contribute
during the period of the fund member's employment or for thirty-two
(32) years, whichever is shorter, an amount equal to six percent (6%)
eight and sixty-five hundredths percent (8.65%) of the salary of a
first class patrolman or firefighter. However, the employer may pay:
(1) with respect to an agreement entered into:
(A) before January 1, 2027; or
(B) after June 30, 2029;
all or a part of the contribution for the member; and
(2) with respect to an agreement entered into after December
31, 2026, but before July 1, 2029:
(A) up to six percent (6%) of the contribution for the
member before July 1, 2029; and
(B) all or a part of the contribution for the member after
June 30, 2029.
The amount of the contribution, other than contributions paid on behalf
of a member, shall be deducted each pay period from each fund
member's salary by the disbursing officer of the employer. The
employer shall send to the system board each year on March 31, June
30, September 30, and December 31, for the calendar quarters ending
on those dates, or an alternate date established by the rules of the
system board, a certified list of fund members and a warrant issued by
the employer for the total amount deducted for fund members'
contributions.".
Page 3, line 34, delete "July 1, 2026," and insert "January 1,
2027,".
Page 3, line 39, delete "June 30, 2026," and insert "December 31,
2026,".
Page 4, line 16, delete "July 1, 2026," and insert "January 1,
2027,".
Page 4, line 24, delete "June 30, 2026," and insert "December 31,
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153


2026,".
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 69 as introduced.)
ROGERS, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0.
SB 69—LS 6341/DI 153